New Jersey, session 221, S3626.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury shall, when determining a four-year public institution of higher educations number of State-funded full-time employee positions for which the State pays fringe benefit costs, ensure that the number of State-funded full-time positions does not exceed a ratio of nine full-time equivalent enrolled students for every one full-time employee position. b.  Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the director from using, for any one four-year public institution of higher education, a ratio of full-time employee positions to full-time equivalent enrolled students that is less than nine-to-one when determining the number of State-funded full-time employee positions. The number of State-funded full-time employee positions at any one four-year public institution of higher education shall not exceed the number of employees at the institution. c.  As used in this section, State-funded full-time employee positions means the number of positions for which the State pays the cost of fringe benefits on behalf of a four-year public institution of higher education. 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year beginning after the date of enactment.